Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 3.
Enforcement.

§ 20-146.22. Definitions.

In this article:

"Petitioner"
means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

"Respondent"
means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

(2001, c. 305.)

Applied

in Tyszcenko v. Donatelli, 53 Va. App. 209, 670 S.E.2d 49, 2008 Va. App. LEXIS 569 (2008).

§ 20-146.23. Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under this article a court of this Commonwealth may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

(2001, c. 305.)

Applied

in Tyszcenko v. Donatelli, 53 Va. App. 209, 670 S.E.2d 49, 2008 Va. App. LEXIS 569 (2008).

§ 20-146.24. Duty to enforce.

A court of this Commonwealth shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this act or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this act and the determination has not been modified in accordance with this act.

A court of this Commonwealth may utilize any remedy available under other law of this Commonwealth to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state. The remedies provided in this article are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-138; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

§ 20-146.25. Temporary visitation.

A court of this Commonwealth that does not have jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

A visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

The visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

If a court of this Commonwealth makes an order under subdivision A 2, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

(2001, c. 305.)

Applied

in Tyszcenko v. Donatelli, 53 Va. App. 209, 670 S.E.2d 49, 2008 Va. App. LEXIS 569 (2008).

§ 20-146.26. Registration of child custody determination.

A child custody determination issued by a court of another state may be registered in this Commonwealth, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate juvenile and domestic relations district court in this Commonwealth:

A letter or other document requesting registration;

Two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been modified; and

Except as otherwise provided in § 20-146.20, the name and address of the person seeking registration and any parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be registered.

On receipt of the documents required by subsection A, the registering court shall:

Cause the determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; and

Serve notice upon the persons named pursuant to subdivision A 3 and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this section.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-139; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees.
§
18.02 Common Law. Bryson.

§ 20-146.27. Enforcement of registered determination.

A court of this Commonwealth may grant any relief normally available under the law of this Commonwealth to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

A court of this Commonwealth shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance with Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-138; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

§ 20-146.28. Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under this article is commenced in a court of this Commonwealth and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-129; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980). For article on modification of an out-of-state child custody decree under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and the federal Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act of 1980, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 773 (1982).

§ 20-146.29. Expedited enforcement of child custody; determination.

A petition under this article must be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any order confirming registration must be attached to the petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination must state:

Whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

Whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this act and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

Whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

The present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

Whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorneys' fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law-enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

If the child custody determination has been registered under § 20-146.26, the date and place of registration.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under subsection C must state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under § 20-146.33, and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

The child custody determination has not been registered under § 20-146.26, and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter;

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of § 20-146.7, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered under § 20-146.26, but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.30. Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in § 20-146.32, the petition and order shall be served, by any method authorized by the law of this Commonwealth, upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.31. Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order pursuant to § 20-146.15, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

The child custody determination has not been registered under § 20-146.26 and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.);

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.); or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of § 20-146.7, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered under § 20-146.26, but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.).

The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under § 20-146.33 and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law-enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship between spouses or between parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this article.

(2001, c. 305; 2020, c. 900.)

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 in subdivision A 1 a, subdivision A 1 b, and subdivision A 2, deleted "of this chapter" at the end of each; and in subsection D, substituted "between spouses or between" for "of husband and wife or."

§ 20-146.32. Ex parte order to take physical custody of child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may request in the petition that the court issue an ex parte order that the child be taken into immediate physical custody if the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this Commonwealth. Any petition for an ex parte order shall include the statements required by subsection B of § 20-146.29.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this Commonwealth, it may issue an ex parte order to take immediate physical custody of the child. A petition filed to enforce a child custody determination which seeks an ex parte order shall be heard on the next judicial day after the ex parte order is issued the unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible.

An ex parte order to take physical custody of a child shall:

Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

Direct law-enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

Provide for the placement of the child with the petitioner, suitable relative, other suitable interested individual or the local department of social services pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition and ex parte order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

An ex parte order to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this Commonwealth. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law-enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law-enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child's custodian.

(2001, c. 305.)

Applied

in Tyszcenko v. Donatelli, 53 Va. App. 209, 670 S.E.2d 49, 2008 Va. App. LEXIS 569 (2008).

§ 20-146.33. Costs, fees, and expenses.

The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney's fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this act.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-136; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 14 Costs.
§
14.01 Items included. Bryson.

§ 20-146.34. Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this Commonwealth shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this act that enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.35. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this article in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under § 20-146.15, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

(2001, c. 305.)